Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.590

Drinking fountain/bottle filling station.

(1) In any construction subject to the requirements of this chapter in which a drinking fountain is required under the international building code as amended and adopted by the building code council, the rules adopted by the building code council must also require the provision of a bottle filling station, or a combined bottle filling station and drinking fountain for each drinking fountain that is required.

(2) The rules required under this section must take effect and be implemented by July 1, 2026, and may be periodically updated thereafter.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "bottle filling station" means a plumbing fixture connected to the potable water distribution system and sanitary drainage system that is designed and intended for filling personal use drinking water bottles or containers not less than 10 inches (254 millimeters) in height. A bottle filling station may be separate from or integral to a drinking fountain and may incorporate a water filter and a cooling system for chilling the drinking water.

[ 2023 c 135 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2023 c 135: "The legislature finds that it is in the public interest to reduce unnecessary plastic waste and sources of plastic pollution in the environment, especially where less-polluting and more sustainable alternatives to plastic products and packaging are available. In this act, the legislature intends to reduce three such sources of plastic and associated pollution:

(1) Single-use plastic water bottles, which frequently end up as litter;

(2) The small plastic containers, wrappers, and packaging for personal health and beauty products, which are still often provided in lodging establishments but easily substituted by bulk dispensers and which are difficult to recycle in current systems; and

(3) Certain thin-walled or soft-shell floating extruded or expanded plastic foam structures, which frequently degrade in the environment and contribute to small and microplastic pollution of marine and shoreline environments." [ 2023 c 135 s 1.]